Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4020.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1164. (1) The commission to update African-American history in K to 12 instruction is created as a temporary commission described in section 4 of article V of the state constitution of 1963. The department shall provide staffing and support for the commission. (2) Not later than 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the governor shall appoint members to the commission in consultation with the department. The commission must consist of the following members: (a) One representative from the University of Michigan's Department of Afroamerican and African Studies. (b) One representative from Michigan State University's Department of African American and African Studies. (c) One representative from Wayne State University's Department of African American Studies. (d) One representative from the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People (NAACP) Michigan conference. (e) One representative from the Charles H. Wright Museum of African American History. (f) One representative from the Jim Crow Museum at Ferris State University. (3) Not later than 120 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall call the first meeting of the commission. At the first meeting, the commission shall elect from among its members a chairperson and other officers as it considers necessary or appropriate. After the first meeting, the commission shall meet at times and places specified by the chairperson or a majority of its members. (4) A majority of the members of the commission constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at a meeting of the commission. A majority of the members present and serving are required for official action of the commission. (5) The business that the commission may perform must be conducted at a public meeting of the commission held in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (6) A writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by the commission in the performance of an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (7) Members of the commission shall serve without compensation and must not be reimbursed for their expenses. (8) Not later than 365 days after the first meeting of the commission, the commission shall review the current recommended model core academic curriculum content standards developed under section 1278 and provide to the state board and the standing committees of the legislature responsible for K to 12 education legislation a recommendation on age- and grade-appropriate instruction for all grade levels on African-American history. The recommended instruction must include both of the following: (a) The study of African-American history during Reconstruction, the Civil Rights Era, and other eras relevant to African-American history. (b) The contributions African-Americans have made to the development of the United States and other countries. (9) After the commission provides to the state board the recommended instruction under subsection (8), not later than 2 school years following the date on which the state board receives the recommended instruction under subsection (8), the state board shall update the recommended model core academic curriculum content standards developed under section 1278 so the standards incorporate the recommended instruction under subsection (8). (10) After the commission provides to the state board the recommended instruction under subsection (8), in addition to the requirements of section 1279g, beginning with assessments conducted during the 2026-2027 school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that the Michigan merit examination social studies component and the M-STEP and any successor state assessment for social studies, as appropriate, include questions related to the learning objectives in the state board recommended model core academic curriculum content standards concerning African-American history. (11) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the board of a school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall ensure that each school it operates provides instruction to pupils at all grade levels operated by that school regarding African-American history, as described in subsection (8). (12) As used in this section, "commission" means the commission to update African-American history in K to 12 instruction created in subsection (1). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.